Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
466K

REAL
ESTATE APPRAISERS

Section

466K-1 Findings and purpose

466K-2 Real estate appraiser program

466K-3 Powers and duties of the director

466K-4 Practice as a real estate appraiser;
uniform

standards

466K‑5 Definitions

466K‑6 Appraisers in arbitration
proceedings; recordation;

nonconfidentiality

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next